Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Unincorporated Cities or Towns

§ 35-9-401.
Appointment of county fire warden.

County commissioners may appoint a county fire warden who shall act under the authority of this article [chapter], W.S.

35-9-101

through

35-9-701

[§§

35-9-101

through

35-9-615

], and the local governmental authority responsible for fire suppression and fire prevention within the county.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 54, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1919; R.S. 1899, § 1130; C.S. 1910, § 1231; C.S. 1920, § 1478; R.S. 1931, § 30-820; C.S. 1945, § 45-201; W.S. 1957, § 35-449; Laws 1989, ch. 75, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Section

35-9-701

was repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 155, § 2. See §

1-1-125

for provisions pertaining to volunteer firefighter immunity.

Counties may not regulate fireworks. —

Sections

35-10-203

,

18-3-509

,

35-9-401

through

35-9-402

, and

35-9-301

through

35-9-304

provide no grants of authority, express or implied, allowing counties to regulate fireworks. Dunnegan v. Laramie County Comm'rs, 852 P.2d 1138,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 35-9-402.
Duties of fire wardens.

Fire wardens or their duly designated representative shall be responsible for management of fire suppression, fire prevention and related activities, except within any incorporated city, town or fire district, and responsible for coordinating fire suppression and fire prevention activities among all county fire agencies.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 54, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1920; R.S. 1899, § 1131; C.S. 1910, § 1232; C.S. 1920, § 1479; R.S. 1931, § 30-821; C.S. 1945, § 45-202; W.S. 1957, § 35-450; Laws 1989, ch. 75, § 1.

Counties may not regulate fireworks. —

Sections

35-10-203

,

18-3-509

,

35-9-401

through

35-9-402

, and

35-9-301

through

35-9-304

provide no grants of authority, express or implied, allowing counties to regulate fireworks. Dunnegan v. Laramie County Comm'rs, 852 P.2d 1138,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1993).

§§ 35-9-403 through 35-9-405.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 75, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duties of fire wardens, see §

35-9-402

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 54, §§ 3 through 5, related to the failure to repair fixtures, the failure to remove material, and the fees of fire wardens and the duty to give notice of nuisances, respectively.

§ 35-9-406.
Abatement of nuisances.

Said board of county commissioners, upon receiving notice as aforesaid, or upon personal knowledge, shall have power to and are hereby authorized to abate any such nuisance at the expense of the person or persons, either by causing the same to be removed, or by filling up, or boarding around such excavations, as the case may be; provided, that said commissioners shall first notify the person or persons aforesaid, to abate such nuisances.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 54, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 1924; R.S. 1899, § 1135; C.S. 1910, § 1236; C.S. 1920, § 1483; R.S. 1931, § 30-825; C.S. 1945, § 45-206; W.S. 1957, § 35-454.